Maryland, session 2025, SB0032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–402.
(a) (1) A tenant under any periodic tenancy, or at the expiration of a lease, and
someone holding under the tenant, who shall unlawfully hold over beyond the expiration of
the lease or termination of the tenancy, shall be liable to the landlord for the actual
damages caused by the holding over.
(2) The damages awarded to a landlord against the tenant or someone
holding under the tenant, may not be less than the apportioned rent for the period of
holdover at the rate under the lease.
(3) (i) Any action to recover damages under this section may be brought
by suit separate from the eviction or removal proceeding or in the same action and in any
court having jurisdiction over the amount in issue.
(ii) The court may also give judgment in favor of the landlord for the
damages determined to be due together with costs of the suit if the court finds that the
residential tenant was personally served with a summons, or, in the case of a nonresidential
tenancy, there was such service of process or submission to the jurisdiction of the court as
would support a judgment in contract or tort.
– 1 –

Ch. 646 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) A nonresidential tenant who was not personally served with a
summons shall not be subject to personal jurisdiction of the court if that tenant asserts that
the appearance is for the purpose of defending an in rem action prior to the time that
evidence is taken by the court.
(4) Nothing [contained herein] IN THIS SECTION is intended to limit any
other remedies which a landlord may have against a holdover tenant under the lease or
under applicable law.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and where any tenancy is for
any definite term or at will, and the landlord shall desire to repossess the property after
the expiration of the term for which it was leased and shall give notice as required under
subsection (c) of this section to the tenant or to the person actually in possession of the
property to remove from the property at the end of the term, and if the tenant or person in
actual possession shall refuse to comply, the landlord may make complaint in writing to
the District Court of the county where the property is located.
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. The court shall issue a summons directed to any constable
or sheriff of the county entitled to serve process, ordering the constable or sheriff to notify
the tenant, assignee, or subtenant to appear on a day stated in the summons before the
court to show cause why restitution should not be made to the landlord[.];
2. The constable or sheriff shall serve the summons on the
tenant, assignee, or subtenant on the property, or on the known or authorized agent of the
tenant, assignee, or subtenant[.];
3. If, for any reason [those persons] THE TENANT,
ASSIGNEE, OR SUBTENANT ON THE PROPERTY OR THE KNOWN OR AUTHORIZED
AGENT OF THE TENANT, ASSIGNEE, OR SUBTENANT cannot be found, the constable or
sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the summons conspicuously on the property[.]; AND
4. After notice to the tenant, assignee, or subtenant by
first–class mail, the affixing of the summons on the property shall be conclusively presumed
to be a sufficient service to support restitution.
(III) 1. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IF THE
LANDLORD OR THE LANDLORD’S SPOUSE:
A. IS ON ACTIVE DUTY WITH THE UNITED STATES
MILITARY;
B. HAS RELOCATED TO THE STATE AS A DIRECT RESULT
OF BEING ON ACTIVE DUTY WITH THE UNITED STATES MILITARY;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 646
C. INTENDS TO OCCUPY THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SECTION FOLLOWING THE ENTRY OF A
JUDGMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
D. SUBMITS DOCUMENTATION SUPPORTING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH WITH THE COMPLAINT.
2. THE COURT SHALL ORDER IN THE SUMMONS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT THE TENANT,
ASSIGNEE, OR SUBTENANT APPEAR BEFORE THE COURT ON A DAY NOT LATER THAN
45 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE LANDLORD MAKES A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS
SECTION TO REPOSSESS THE PROPERTY.
3. IF THE CONSTABLE OR SHERIFF OF THE COUNTY
FAILS TO SERVE THE SUMMONS REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE SUMMONS IS ISSUED BY THE COURT, THE
SUMMONS MAY BE SERVED BY A PRIVATE PROCESS SERVER.
[(iii)] (IV) Upon the failure of either of the parties to appear before
the court on the day stated in the summons, the court may continue the case to a day not
less than 6 nor more than 10 days after the day first stated and notify the parties of the
continuance.
(2) (i) If upon hearing the parties, or in case the tenant or person in
possession shall neglect to appear after the summons and continuance the court shall find
that the landlord had been in possession of the leased property, that the said tenancy is
fully ended and expired, that due notice to quit as aforesaid had been given to the tenant
or person in possession and that the tenant or person in possession had refused so to do,
the court shall thereupon give judgment for the restitution of the possession of said
premises and shall forthwith issue its warrant to the sheriff or a constable in the respective
counties commanding the tenant or person in possession forthwith to deliver to the landlord
possession thereof in as full and ample manner as the landlord was possessed of the same
at the time when the tenancy was made, and shall give judgment for costs against the
tenant or person in possession so holding over.
(ii) Either party shall have the right to appeal therefrom to the
circuit court for the county within 10 days from the judgment.
(iii) If the tenant appeals and files with the District Court an affidavit
that the appeal is not taken for delay, and also a good and sufficient bond with one or more
securities conditioned that the tenant will prosecute the appeal with effect and well and
truly pay all rent in arrears and all costs in the case before the District Court and in the
appellate court and all loss or damage which the landlord may suffer by reason of the
tenant’s holding over, including the value of the premises during the time the tenant shall
– 3 –

Ch. 646 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
so hold over, then the tenant or person in possession of said premises may retain possession
thereof until the determination of said appeal.
(iv) The appellate court shall, upon application of either party, set a
day for the hearing of the appeal, not less than 5 nor more than 15 days after the
application, and notice for the order for a hearing shall be served on the opposite party or
that party’s counsel at least 5 days before the hearing.
(v) If the judgment of the District Court shall be in favor of the
landlord, a warrant shall be issued by the appellate court to the sheriff, who shall proceed
forthwith to execute the warrant.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to all cases of tenancies at the expiration of a
stated term, tenancies from year to year, tenancies from month to month, and tenancies
from week to week.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a
landlord shall provide written notice of the intent to terminate a tenancy:
(i) If the parties have a written lease for a stated term in excess of
1 week or a tenancy from month to month, 60 days before the expiration of the tenancy;
(ii) In the case of tenancies from year to year, including tobacco farm
tenancies from year to year but excluding all other farm tenancies from year to year, 90
days before the expiration of the current year of the tenancy;
(iii) In the case of tenancies from year to year for all other farm
tenancies, 180 days before the expiration of the current year of the tenancy; and
(iv) In the case of tenancies from week to week:
1. If the parties have a written lease, 7 days before the
expiration of the tenancy; or
2. If the parties do not have a written lease, 21 days before
the expiration of the tenancy.
(3) (i) When the tenant shall give notice by parol to the landlord or to
the landlord’s agent or representatives, at least 30 days before the expiration of the lease
or tenancy in all cases except in cases of tenancies from year to year, and at least 90 days’
notice in all cases of tenancy from year to year (except in all cases of farm tenancy, the
notice shall be 180 days), of the intention of the tenant to remove at the end of that year
and to surrender possession of the property at that time, and the landlord, the landlord’s
agent, or representative shall prove the notice from the tenant by competent testimony, it
shall not be necessary for the landlord, the landlord’s agent or representative to provide a
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 646
written notice to the tenant, but the proof of such notice from the tenant as aforesaid shall
entitle the landlord to recover possession of the property hereunder.
(ii) This paragraph shall not apply in Baltimore City.
(4) (i) This paragraph does not apply to a property that is:
1. In Baltimore City or Montgomery County;
2. Owned by a landlord who offers 5 or more residential
dwelling units for rent in the State; or
3. Subject to an order to docket under § 7–105.1(e) of this
article.
(ii) If a landlord receives notice of an intent to foreclose on the
property under § 7–105.1(c)(1) of this article and desires to terminate the tenancy, the
landlord shall provide written notice of the intent to terminate a tenancy:
1. At least 30 days before the expiration of the lease in cases
of tenancies from month to month or tenancies from week to week; or
2. At least 60 days before the expiration of the lease in cases
of tenancies from year to year.
(5) (i) Acceptance of any payment after notice but before eviction shall
not operate as a waiver of any notice to quit, notice of intent to vacate or any judgment for
possession unless the parties specifically otherwise agree in writing.
(ii) Any payment accepted shall be first applied to the rent or the
equivalent of rent apportioned to the date that the landlord actually recovers possession of
the premises, then to court costs, including court awarded damages and legal fees and then
to any loss of rent caused by the holdover.
(iii) Any payment which is accepted in excess of the foregoing shall
not bear interest but will be returned to the tenant in the same manner as security deposits
as defined under § 8–203 of this title but shall not be subject to the penalties of that section.
(d) Unless stated otherwise in the written lease and initialed by the tenant, when
a landlord consents to a holdover tenant remaining on the premises, the holdover tenant
becomes a periodic week–to–week tenant if the tenant was a week–to–week tenant before
the tenant’s holding over, and a periodic month–to–month tenant in all other cases.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
– 5 –

Ch. 646 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –